Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1642
Livestock waste control facility; approvals required.

An applicant for a permit for a livestock waste control facility which includes a dam, holding pond, or lagoon for which approval by the Chief Water Officer is not otherwise required but for which approval under section 54-2429 is required shall submit an application for approval along with plans, drawings, and specifications to the Chief Water Officer and obtain approval from the Chief Water Officer before beginning construction. The Chief Water Officer shall approve or deny the dam, holding pond, or lagoon pursuant to this section within sixty days after such application is submitted.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 42;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 53;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 282.